Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-360
Program; tax levy; use.

The county board of each county in this state may levy upon every dollar of the taxable value of all the taxable property in such county, for the use of the county board in carrying out the animal damage control program, such amount as may be determined to be necessary therefor. The entire fund derived from such levy shall be set apart in a separate fund and expended only for animal damage control as defined by sections 23-358 to 23-360.

Laws 1945, c. 53, § 3, p. 238;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 46, p. 958;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 117;

Laws 1987, LB 102, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 103;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 46.